Arkansas, session 2025, HB1770.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 27, Chapter 15, Subchapter 3, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
27-15-318. Pregnancy Parking Act — Temporary special certificate
during and after pregnancy.
(a) This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Pregnancy Parking
Act".
(b) A woman who is pregnant, as determined by a licensed physician,
may apply to the Office of Motor Vehicle for a temporary person-with-a-
disability special certificate.
(c) The temporary special certificate shall:
(1) Conform to the requirements under § 27-15-304(a)-(c); and
(2) Expire one (1) year following the date the pregnant woman
*JMB481*
03/12/2025 4:05:51 PM JMB481

HB1770
gives birth.
(d) The Office of Motor Vehicles shall:
(1) Develop an appropriate form, including a provision for a
sworn statement of pregnancy, for use by an applicant to request issuance of
the temporary special person-with-a-disability certificate for a pregnant or
post-partum woman;
(2) Distribute a copy of this subchapter to all appropriate law
enforcement agencies charged with enforcement of the Motor Vehicle Code;
(3) Adopt procedures and promulgate rules to advise and inform
the general public of the provisions of this subchapter and the availability
of the temporary special certificates;
(4) Maintain accurate records of the annual number of temporary
special certificates issued and in inventory;
(5) Enter into the permanent record of each applicant, the
temporary special certificate number, and type of allowable disability of the
applicant in a manner that will allow retrieval of the information for
statistical use; and
(6) Include a notice with each application for a temporary
special certificate informing the applicant and any other person driving for
the applicant of the requirements of this subchapter and further informing
the applicant that the privilege to park in spaces reserved for persons with
disabilities shall be available only when the person for whom the temporary
special certificate was issued or a person with a disability is actually in
the vehicle.
(e) The Office of Motor Vehicle may promulgate rules to administer the
provisions of this section.










03/12/2025 4:05:51 PM JMB481